Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB504.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. The Judicial Branch Budget is as follows:
PART I
OPERATING BUDGET
(1) Funds Appropriations: There is appropriated out of the General Fund, Restricted Funds accounts, or
Federal Funds accounts for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, for the fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, and for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, and ending June 30,
2028, the following sums to be used for the purposes of the Judicial Branch of the government of the Commonwealth
of Kentucky, including the Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, Circuit Court, Family Court, District Court, the
Administrative Office of the Courts, Judicial Retirement, Local Facilities Fund, Local Facilities Use Allowance
Contingency Fund, and for services performed by the Circuit Court Clerks' offices, including both Circuit and District
Court support.
A. JUDICIAL BRANCH
Budget Units
1. COURT OF JUSTICE
a. Court Operations and Administration
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund -0- 344,440,300 348,471,700
Restricted Funds 13,629,600 57,506,000 57,853,700
Federal Funds -0- 1,546,600 1,391,000
TOTAL 13,629,600 403,492,900 407,716,400
(1) Full Funding of Current Services: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $5,000,000 in
each fiscal year to support additional judgeships established in the 2022 Regular Session.
(2) Funds Required to Maintain Mandated Services: Included in the above General Fund appropriation
is $7,561,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $7,200,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to maintain mandated services
including information technology subscription fees, audio/visual system upgrades, and contractor rate increases.
(3) Civil Filing Fees: Pursuant to its authority, if the Supreme Court increases civil filing fees, the
additional income resulting from the fee increases, not to exceed $20,468,100 in each fiscal year, shall be deposited
into a trust and agency account for court operations and salaries for non-elected personnel. Any revenue generated by
the increase in excess of the $20,468,100 in each fiscal year shall be deposited into the General Fund. The
Administrative Office of the Courts shall prepare a report with recommendations for changes to civil filing fees,
including but not limited to the amount of revenue generated from any proposed changes, the use of any additional
revenue generated, the number of Circuit and District Court filings for the prior three years, and a schedule for any
future changes to fee structure. The report shall be submitted to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue by October 1, 2027.
(4) Utilization of Video Arraignment Technology: (a) Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary,
courts shall use the video arraignment system set forth in 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 194, sec. 14(1)(a), when available.
(b) Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, if a court does not use the video arraignment system
referenced in paragraph (a) of this subsection, when available, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall be
responsible for the costs associated with transporting prisoners to and from arraignments. The Administrative Office
of the Courts shall prepare a report to be submitted to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
October 1, 2027, detailing the utilization of the video arraignment system, including identifying any impediments that
decrease utilization, by courtroom and by judge.
(5) Operating Expense Reduction: The State Auditor has identified that in fiscal year 2024-2025, the
Judicial Branch spent $5,088,350 on the expense code Other (E399). The Chief Justice and the Director of the
Administrative Office of the Courts shall prepare a report detailing the expenditures on expense code Other (E399)
including, but not limited to drug testing, cloud services, and information technology services. The Director of the
Administrative Office of the Courts shall submit the report to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue by October 1, 2026.
(6) Support for Current Services: Pursuant to KRS 27A.055(4), included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriation is $13,629,600 in fiscal year 2025-2026 to support the Court Operations and Administration budget
unit and replace, in part, reduced revenues received by the Master Commissioner’s Fund established in KRS
31A.010(4). Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any portion of these funds that have not been expended by the end of
fiscal year 2025-2026 shall not lapse and shall carry forward into fiscal year 2026-2027, and any portion of these
funds that have not been expended by the end of fiscal year 2026-2027 shall not lapse and shall carry forward into
fiscal year 2027-2028.
b. Local Facilities Fund
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund -0- 136,303,000 149,205,200
Restricted Funds 8,910,400 8,380,000 380,000
TOTAL 8,910,400 144,683,000 149,585,200
(1) Uninsured Costs Due to Flooding: Pursuant to KRS 27A.055(4), included in the above Restricted
Funds appropriation is $8,910,400 in fiscal year 2025-2026 for file restoration, remediation, and repairs due to
flooding in Franklin and Hardin Counties. Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any unexpended funds shall not lapse and
shall carry forward.
(2) Local Facility Projects: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $13,652,200 in fiscal
year 2027-2028 to support the use allowance costs for five judicial centers authorized by the 2024 General Assembly.
(3) Funding of Current Services: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $1,000,000 in each
fiscal year to fund current services.
(4) Boyle County Temporary Space and Fit-up: Pursuant to KRS 27A.055(4), included in the above
Restricted Funds appropriation is $5,260,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $260,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for
leased space and fit-up for all court and clerk functions.
(5) Boyle County - Use Allowance: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $192,300 in each
fiscal year to support use allowance for Boyle County.
(6) Bell County Temporary Space and Fit-up: Pursuant to KRS 27A.055(4), included in the above
Restricted Funds appropriation is $3,120,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $120,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for
leased space and fit-up for all court and clerk functions.
(7) Bell County Use Allowance and Equipment: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$2,806,100 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to support use allowance and equipment and $2,056,100 in fiscal year 2027-
2028 to support use allowance. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall pursue any and all potential claims for
liability associated with damages stemming from subpar construction of the Bell County Judicial Center.
(8) Local Court Facility Compensation: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are moneys to
compensate local units of government for providing court space and for costs incurred in the development of local
court facilities as defined in KRS Chapter 26A and provided for in Part II, Capital Projects Budget, of this Act, and to
perform all other acts required or authorized by KRS Chapter 26A.
(9) Use Allowance Payments to Counties: Pursuant to KRS 26A.090(2), beginning with court facility
construction or renovation projects authorized by the 2000 Regular Session of the General Assembly and all
subsequent court facility projects, use allowance payments are restricted to the court's proportional share of the
annual principal and interest costs in connection with the construction or renovation of the facility, not to exceed the
authorized annual use allowance.

CHAPTER 183 3
(10) Court Facility Maintenance Fund: (a) Notwithstanding KRS 26A.090(2), when there is no debt on
court facility construction or renovation projects authorized prior to the 2000 Regular Session of the General
Assembly, use allowance is restricted to compensation equal to two percent annually of capital costs to be paid to the
county unit of government and two percent annually to be retained by the Administrative Office of the Courts and
directed to a separate fund specifically for maintenance of court facilities.
(b) The fund created pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be used for routine, ongoing,
planned, and unanticipated maintenance for court facilities.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 45.750, any maintenance project estimated to cost $3,000,000 or less for a local
court facility is not considered to be a capital project requiring authorization of the General Assembly in the Judicial
Branch Budget and may be completed using funds appropriated to the Judicial Branch for maintenance of local
facilities or other agency funds of the Judicial Branch. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall report any
maintenance project estimated to cost between $1,000,000 and $3,000,000 to the Capital Projects and Bond
Oversight Committee.
(11) Maintenance Pool: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $3,000,000 in each fiscal year
to create a maintenance pool for planned and unanticipated non-capital projects for local courthouses and judicial
centers.
(12) Asset Preservation Pool - HVAC, Roof, and Electrical Upgrades: The Administrative Office of the
Courts shall prepare a report on the Asset Preservation - HVAC, Roof, Electrical project authorized in 2024 Ky. Acts
ch. 148, Part II, A., 1., 007., including but not limited to the projects funded in the asset preservation pool, the current
status of each project and projected completion date, and the amount expended on each project and for the pool in
total. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall submit this report on a quarterly basis beginning November 1,
2026, to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.
(13) Asset Preservation Pool - Renovations: The Administrative Office of the Courts shall prepare a report
on the Asset Preservation - Renovations project authorized in 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 148, Part II, A., 1., 008., including
but not limited to the projects funded in the asset preservation pool, the current status of each project and projected
completion date, and the amount expended on each project and for the pool in total. The Administrative Office of the
Courts shall submit this report on a quarterly basis beginning November 1, 2026, to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue.
c. Local Facilities Use Allowance Contingency Fund
(1) Funds Carry Forward: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any unexpended balance remaining at the close
of fiscal year 2025-2026 shall not lapse and shall continue into fiscal year 2026-2027, and any unexpended balance
remaining at the close of fiscal year 2026-2027 shall not lapse and shall continue into fiscal year 2027-2028 to
provide for cost overruns in authorized court facilities projects not to exceed 15 percent of the use allowance in
accordance with KRS Chapter 26A.
TOTAL – COURT OF JUSTICE
General Fund -0- 480,743,300 497,676,900
Restricted Funds 22,540,000 65,886,000 58,233,700
Federal Funds -0- 1,546,600 1,391,000
TOTAL 22,540,000 548,175,900 557,301,600
2. JUDICIAL FORM RETIREMENT SYSTEM
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 645,500 652,300
(1) Administrative Expenses: Pursuant to KRS 21.540, administrative expenses shall be paid out of an
administrative account which shall be funded by transfers of the necessary moneys, in appropriate ratio, from the
funds described in KRS 21.550 and 21.560. Notwithstanding Part III, 7. of this Act, Restricted Funds appropriations
may be increased to ensure sufficient funding to support the Judicial Form Retirement System.
(2) Pension Benefit Increase: Notwithstanding KRS 21.405(5), no pension benefit increase shall be
granted to recipients of a retirement allowance under KRS 21.345 to 21.580 on July 1, 2026, or July 1, 2027.
TOTAL - JUDICIAL BRANCH
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund -0- 480,743,300 497,676,900
Restricted Funds 22,540,000 66,531,500 58,886,000
Federal Funds -0- 1,546,600 1,391,000
TOTAL 22,540,000 548,821,400 557,953,900
PART II
CAPITAL PROJECTS BUDGET
(1) Authorization of Capital Projects: It is the intent of the General Assembly that any capital project
proposed by any state government entity, including the agencies and subdivisions of the Court of Justice, shall be
authorized by the General Assembly prior to the project’s financing and construction, in accordance with KRS
7A.010, 7A.120, 45.750, 45.760, 45.763, 45.765, and 48.110. Pursuant to KRS 45.760(1), the amount allotted, from
all sources, for expenditure on any capital project, including leases as defined by KRS 45.750, shall not exceed the
estimated cost as shown in this Act.
(2) Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee: Capital construction projects and major items of
equipment that are not specifically listed in this Act may be authorized only after submission of the project to the
Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee and in accordance with the other requirements of KRS 45.760(7).
Moneys may be transferred to the allotment account of any capital project only after submission of the project to the
Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee and in accordance with the other requirements of KRS 45.760(6). As
required by KRS 45.760, all capital construction items authorized in this Act shall be constructed in accordance with
this Act, supporting documentation considered by the General Assembly, and Judicial Branch budget records. Any
modifications to the scope of a capital construction project or to a lease shall be reported to the Capital Projects and
Bond Oversight Committee before execution.
(3) Deferred Funding: General Fund support to provide operating costs of $1,911,000 and $3,000,000 for
nonrecurring equipment and furniture for five projects authorized by the 2024 General Assembly is deferred to the
2028-2030 fiscal biennium.
(4) Court Facility Planning Process: A feasibility study completed by a certified architect not otherwise
involved with the project shall be provided to the Project Development Board to assist in making a determination
whether the needs of the community and the Court of Justice can best be met through the construction of a
freestanding building, or through an addition and/or renovation of the existing court facility.
(5) Local Facilities Use Allowance Contingency Fund: For any court facility project which is occupied
and use allowance funding is insufficient, the use allowance payments shall be approved from the Local Facilities
Use Allowance Contingency Fund. If funds are not available in the Local Facilities Use Allowance Contingency
Fund, the Chief Justice may transfer funds from other Judicial Branch accounts to make the necessary payments.
(6) Facility Title: Pursuant to KRS Chapter 26A, Hardin County shall accept title to the facility as set out
in 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 162, Part II, A., 2., 004., Hardin County - HVAC Project, within six months of notification by
the Administrative Office of the Courts of the completion of the project. Notwithstanding KRS Chapter 26A.090(2),
no use allowance shall be provided for this facility if Hardin County does not accept title as provided in this
subsection.
A. JUDICIAL BRANCH
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
1. LOCAL FACILITIES FUND
Project Project Scope
001. Boyle County - Roof Replacement 2,000,000
002. Bell County - Renovation 20,910,000
2. LEASE AUTHORIZATIONS
001. Franklin County - Lease - Court of Appeals
002. Jefferson County - Lease - Parking
003. Madison County - Lease - Family Court

CHAPTER 183 5
PART III
GENERAL PROVISIONS
1. Expenditure Authority: The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, with the approval of
the Chief Justice, may expend any of the funds appropriated for court operations and administration in any lawful
manner and for any legal purpose that the Chief Justice shall authorize or direct. No executive agency of state
government shall have the power to restrict or limit the expenditure of funds appropriated to the Judicial Branch of
government, except that funds appropriated in this Act shall not be expended for any purpose not specifically
authorized by the General Assembly in this Act. The Court of Justice shall prepare a report of actual expenditures
citing specific statutory or budgetary authorization for the reported expenditures and detailing expenditures for the
Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, Circuit Court, Family Court, District Court, Administrative Office of the Courts,
Judicial Retirement, Local Facilities Fund, Local Facilities Use Allowance Contingency Fund, and for services
performed by the Circuit Court Clerks' offices. The Court of Justice shall provide this report on a quarterly basis to
the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.
2. Severability of Budget Provisions: Appropriation items and sums in this Act conform to KRS 48.311.
If any section, any subsection, or any provision thereof shall be invalid or unconstitutional, the decision of the courts
shall not affect or impair any of the remaining sections, subsections, or provisions.
3. Duplicate Appropriations: Any appropriation item and sum in this Act and in an appropriation
provision in another Act of the 2026 Regular Session of the General Assembly which constitutes a duplicate
appropriation shall be governed by KRS 48.312.
4. Priority of Individual Appropriations: KRS 48.313 shall control when a total or subtotal figure in
this Act conflicts with the sum of the appropriations of which it consists.
5. Carry Forward of Funds: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any unexpended balance remaining at the
close of the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, June 30, 2027, and June 30, 2028, shall not lapse and shall continue
into the next fiscal year.
6. Final Budget Document: The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts shall prepare a final
budget document reflecting the 2026-2028 biennial budget of the Court of Justice. A copy shall be provided to the
Legislative Research Commission, and an informational copy shall be furnished to the Finance and Administration
Cabinet, within 60 days of the adjournment of the 2026 Regular Session of the General Assembly.
7. Appropriations Revisions: Notwithstanding KRS 48.630(10), no appropriation from any fund
source shall exceed the sum specified in this Act until the Judicial Branch has documented the necessity, purpose,
use, and source, and the documentation has been submitted to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue at least 30 days in advance for its review and action. The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts
shall notify, on a timely basis, the Legislative Research Commission of the most current estimates of anticipated
receipts for the affected fiscal year and an accompanying statement which explains variations from the anticipated
amount.
8. Maximum Salary of Trial Commissioners: Notwithstanding KRS 24A.100(3), no trial commissioner
shall be compensated at a rate greater than $2,000 per year. No funding is provided for trial commissioners
commissioned in counties with a residing District Judge.
9. Authorized Personnel Complement: On July 1, 2026, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall
establish a record for each budget unit of authorized permanent full-time and all other positions based upon the
enacted Judicial Budget of the Commonwealth and any adjustments authorized by provisions in this Act. The total
number of filled permanent full-time and all other positions shall not exceed the authorized complements pursuant to
this section. The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts may request an increase in the number of
authorized positions to the Chief Justice. Upon approval, the Administrative Office of the Courts may authorize the
employment of individuals in addition to the authorized complement. A report of the actions authorized in this
section shall be provided to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue on a monthly basis.
10. Debt Restructuring: Notwithstanding any other provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, use
allowance payments shall not be amended to reflect debt restructuring transactions undertaken by a county during the
2026-2028 fiscal biennium.
11. Court Facility Maintenance Fund Report: For each of the periods ending June 30, 2026, June 30,
2027, and June 30, 2028, the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts shall prepare a court facility
maintenance report. This report shall detail all court facility maintenance undertaken by the Court of Justice, to
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
include any cost-sharing with counties, as well as detail regarding future maintenance needs. This report shall include
a statewide expenditure summary followed by individual county expenditures detailing the state's and county's
respective share of expenditures. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide this report to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by September 15 of each fiscal year.
12. Biennial Audits: The Auditor of Public Accounts shall have the right to review, upon request, the
accountant’s work papers.
13. Budgetary Restructuring: The Court of Justice shall prepare a report to be submitted to the Interim
Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by September 1 of each fiscal year detailing the existing budget
processes of the Court of Justice and the actual expenditure of funds from the prior fiscal year and budgeted
expenditures for the current fiscal year by fund source and individual location or office, for the Supreme Court, Court
of Appeals, Circuit Court, Family Court, District Court, Administrative Office of the Courts, Judicial Retirement,
Local Facilities Fund, Local Facilities Use Allowance Contingency Fund, and for services performed by the Circuit
Court Clerks' offices.
14. Unexpended Use Allowance: Notwithstanding any provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, any
General Fund moneys appropriated for project-related expenses or use allowance payments in fiscal years 2026-2027
and 2027-2028 that are not expended specifically for project-related expenses or use allowance payments in the fiscal
year in which appropriated shall be transferred to the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705).
15. Salary Increase for Personnel: Notwithstanding KRS 64.480(2), included in the General Fund,
Restricted Funds, and Federal Funds appropriations in Part I of this Act are sufficient funds to support a two percent
salary increase on the base salary and wages of each eligible employee effective July 1, 2026, and a two percent
increase on the base salary or wages of each eligible employee effective July 1, 2027.
16. Application for Federal Funds: Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, the Court of Justice shall
report to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue, within 30 days, any new federally funded
programs for which funding had not previously been awarded without authorization by the General Assembly.
17. Operational Expenditures Data: The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts shall, by
October 1, 2026, submit a report to the Legislative Oversight and Investigations Committee and the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue with the following information and data pertaining to the historical and
projected operational expenditures for each budget unit:
(1) Identifying information of the budget unit; and
(2) A description of each program, function, service, or benefit provided by the budget unit, including but
not limited to the following:
(a) Measurable outcome data for the program, function, service, or benefit provided in fiscal year 2025-
2026 and projected for fiscal years 2026–2027 and 2027–2028 for programs, functions, services, or benefits that are
statutorily mandated;
(b) Measurable outcome data for the program, function, service, or benefit provided in fiscal year 2025-
2026 and projected for fiscal years 2026–2027 and 2027–2028 for programs, functions, services, or benefits that are
not statutorily mandated;
(c) Identification of any contracts or grants with other state budget units or external providers engaged to
provide or assist in providing the program, function, service, or benefit in fiscal years 2025-2026, 2026-2027, or
2027-2028;
(d) The number of full-time, part-time, and other filled positions assigned to the program, function, service,
or benefit on July 1 of each fiscal year;
(e) The number and projected cost of all temporary manpower service personnel assigned to the program,
function, service, or benefit as of July 1 each fiscal year;
(f) The actual expenditures, by fund source, for each program, function, service, or benefit for fiscal year
2025-2026;
(g) The projected expenditures, by fund source, by fiscal year, for each program, function, service, or
benefit for fiscal years 2026-2027 and 2027-2028; and
(h) The actual balance of any Restricted Funds or Agency Trust Funds assigned to the program, function,
service, or benefit as of July 1, 2026, and projected to be on July 1, 2027, and July 1, 2028.

CHAPTER 183 7
The information shall be submitted only in a format prescribed by the Legislative Oversight and Investigations
Committee.
The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts shall, within 30 days, provide any follow-up or
additional information on the programs, functions, services, or benefits requested by the Legislative Research
Commission or a subcommittee thereof.
18. Budget Implementation: The General Assembly directs the Judicial Branch to carry out all
appropriations and budgetary language provisions as contained in the Judicial Branch Budget. The Legislative
Research Commission shall review quarterly expenditure data to determine if the Judicial Branch is out of
compliance with this directive. If the Legislative Research Commission suspects that the Judicial Branch has acted in
nonconformity with this section, the Legislative Research Commission may order an audit or review at the Judicial
Branch's expense. Such audit findings, reviews, and reports shall be subject to the Kentucky Open Records Act. The
Chief Justice shall provide, in the form and manner prescribed by the Legislative Research Commission, a
comprehensive annual report, beginning September 1, 2026, to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue detailing expenditures related to the appropriations contained within the budgetary language provisions for
each budget unit within the Judicial Branch. If a budget unit does not expend the full General Fund appropriation
contained within a budgetary language provision, the unexpended funds shall be transferred to the Budget Reserve
Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705).
19. Budgetary Priorities: Funds appropriated in this Act are deemed sufficient to maintain the mandatory
functions of the Court of Justice. The Chief Justice shall prioritize the expenditure of funds to maintain current
service levels of the constitutional functions of the Court of Justice and shall have the discretion to fund any
additional functions to the extent funds are available. If, in the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium, the Chief Justice identifies
a budget shortfall, reductions shall be made to those functions not explicitly authorized by statute or the Constitution
of Kentucky.
PART IV
BUDGET REDUCTION OR SURPLUS EXPENDITURE PLAN
The Judicial Branch shall participate in any Budget Reduction Plan or Surplus Expenditure Plan in accordance
with KRS Chapter 48, except that obligations essential to the constitutional duties and use allowance of the Judicial
Branch shall be exempt from any Budget Reduction Plan. The level of participation in a Budget Reduction Plan shall
be at the discretion of the Chief Justice and shall not exceed the actual percentage of revenue shortfall.
Vetoed in Part and Overridden April 14, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version